District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.51

Reporting requirements for entities receiving grants under the federal recovery act.

All nonprofit organizations, companies, associations, contractors, and subcontractors who receive a grant or funding under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, approved February 17, 2009 (Pub. L. No. 111-5; 98 Stat. 1861) (“ARRA”), shall:

(1)

As a condition of the grant or funding, list all jobs that shall be created as a result of the grant or funding on the Department of Employment Services website;

(2)

Provide the list required by paragraph (1) of this section to the Department of Employment Services; and

(3)

Inform the Department of Employment Services of the number of District residents hired for ARRA-funded positions once the positions created as a result of a grant or funding under the ARRA are filled.

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-194, § 2, 57 DCR 4512
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of the Stimulus Accountability Temporary Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-75, October 22, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 8660).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Stimulus Accountability Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-143, July 13, 2009, 56 DCR 5872).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Stimulus Accountability Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-194, October 5, 2009, 56 DCR 8124).